Florida, session 2026, HB1545.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
193.155, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
193.155 Homestead assessments.—Homestead property shall be
assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving
the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed
at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property
receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8)
apply.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) and s. 193.624,
changes, additions, or improvements to homestead property shall
be assessed at just value as of the first January 1 after the
changes, additions, or improvements are substantially completed.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1545-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1545 2026
Maintenance or repair of the homestead property, including roof
or window replacement, may not be considered to be a change, an
addition, or an improvement under this subsection.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (10) of section
196.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
196.011 Annual application required for exemption.—
(10)(a) A county may, at the request of the property
appraiser and by a majority vote of its governing body, waive
the requirement that an annual application or statement be made
for exemption of property within the county after an initial
application is made and the exemption granted. The waiver under
this subsection of the annual application or statement
requirement applies to all exemptions under this chapter except
the exemption under s. 196.1995. Notwithstanding such waiver,
refiling of an application or statement shall be required when
any property granted an exemption is sold or otherwise disposed
of, when the ownership changes in any manner, when the applicant
for homestead exemption ceases to use the property as his or her
homestead, or when the status of the owner changes so as to
change the exempt status of the property. In its deliberations
on whether to waive the annual application or statement
requirement, the governing body shall consider the possibility
of fraudulent exemption claims which may occur due to the waiver
of the annual application requirement. The owner of any property
granted an exemption who is not required to file an annual
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1545-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1545 2026
application or statement shall notify the property appraiser
promptly whenever the use of the property or the status or
condition of the owner changes so as to change the exempt status
of the property. If any property owner fails to so notify the
property appraiser and the property appraiser determines that
for any year within the prior 10 years the owner was not
entitled to receive such exemption, the owner of the property is
subject to the taxes exempted as a result of such failure plus
payment of interest at the rate set forth in s. 213.235 of the
unpaid taxes for each year, and a penalty of three times the
interest rate set forth in s. 213.235, not to exceed 50 percent
of the unpaid taxes for each year 15 percent interest per annum
and a penalty of 50 percent of the taxes exempted. Except for
homestead exemptions controlled by s. 196.161, the property
appraiser making such determination shall record in the public
records of the county a notice of tax lien against any property
owned by that person or entity in the county, and such property
must be identified in the notice of tax lien. Except as provided
in paragraph (b), such property is subject to the payment of all
taxes and penalties. Such lien when filed shall attach to any
property, identified in the notice of tax lien, owned by the
person who illegally or improperly received the exemption. If
such person no longer owns property in that county but owns
property in some other county or counties in the state, the
property appraiser shall record a notice of tax lien in such
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1545-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1545 2026
other county or counties, identifying the property owned by such
person or entity in such county or counties, and it shall become
a lien against such property in such county or counties. Before
a lien may be filed, the person or entity so notified must be
given 30 days to pay the taxes.
Section 3. Subsection (9) of section 196.075, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
196.075 Additional homestead exemption for persons 65 and
older.—
(9)(a) If the property appraiser determines that for any
year within the immediately previous 10 years a person who was
not entitled to the additional homestead exemption under this
section was granted such an exemption, the property appraiser
shall serve upon the owner a notice of intent to record in the
public records of the county a notice of tax lien against any
property owned by that person in the county, and that property
must be identified in the notice of tax lien. Any property that
is owned by the taxpayer and is situated in this state is
subject to the taxes exempted by the improper homestead
exemption, plus payment of interest at the rate set forth in s.
213.235 of the unpaid taxes for each year, and a penalty of
three times the interest rate set forth in s. 213.235, not to
exceed 50 percent of the unpaid taxes for each year and interest
at a rate of 15 percent per annum. Before any such lien may be
100 filed, the owner must be given 30 days within which to pay the
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1545-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1545 2026
101 taxes, penalties, and interest. Such a lien is subject to the
102 procedures and provisions set forth in s. 196.161(3).
103 Section 4. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
104 196.161, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
105 196.161 Homestead exemptions; lien imposed on property of
106 person claiming exemption although not a permanent resident.—
107 (1)(a) When the estate of any person is being probated or
108 administered in another state under an allegation that such
109 person was a resident of that state and the estate of such
110 person contains real property situate in this state upon which
111 homestead exemption has been allowed pursuant to s. 196.031 for
112 any year or years within 10 years immediately prior to the death
113 of the deceased, then within 3 years after the death of such
114 person the property appraiser of the county where the real
115 property is located shall, upon knowledge of such fact, record a
116 notice of tax lien against the property among the public records
117 of that county, and the property shall be subject to the payment
118 of all taxes exempt thereunder, plus payment of interest at the
119 rate set forth in s. 213.235 of the unpaid taxes for each year,
120 and a penalty of three times the interest rate set forth in s.
121 213.235, not to exceed 50 percent of the unpaid taxes for each
122 year, plus 15 percent interest per year, unless the circuit
123 court having jurisdiction over the ancillary administration in
124 this state determines that the decedent was a permanent resident
125 of this state during the year or years an exemption was allowed,
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1545-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1545 2026
126 whereupon the lien shall not be filed or, if filed, shall be
127 canceled of record by the property appraiser of the county where
128 the real estate is located.
129 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1545-00